South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S291.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Continuing authority to pay government expenses SECTION 1.    (A) If the 2025-2026 State Fiscal Year begins with no annual appropriations act in effect for that year, then the authority to pay the recurring expenses of state government continues at the level of amounts appropriated in Act 226 of 2024 for the recurring expenses of state government for Fiscal Year 2025-2026 except as provided in subsection (B). Non-recurring appropriations contained in Act 226 of 2024 are deemed to have been made and are not subject to funding pursuant to this act. Study committees formed and authorized pursuant to Act 226 of 2024 are deemed to have completed their work and are dissolved unless authorized by another act of the General Assembly. The effective dates of Parts IA and IB of Act 226 of 2024 are extended until the effective date for appropriations made in the general appropriations act for Fiscal Year 2025-2026, after which appropriations made pursuant to this joint resolution are deemed to have been made pursuant to the general appropriations act for Fiscal Year 2025-2026. (B) Notwithstanding debt service appropriations in Act 226 of 2024 and until the effective date of the appropriations made in the general appropriations act for Fiscal Year 2025-2026, there is appropriated from the general fund of the State whatever amount is necessary for the timely debt service on state obligations and other amounts constitutionally required to be appropriated, including the Capital Reserve Fund. The General Reserve Fund is established in the amount required by law. Time effective SECTION 2.    This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 24th day of April, 2025. Approved the 28th day of April, 2025. __________